North Carolina, session 2025, HB393.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The Arts Council,
Inc., to support the 1Love Festival, a three-day festival held in the City of Winston-Salem
designed to celebrate diversity, foster unity, and provide a platform for cultural expression
through music, arts, and entertainment.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H393-v-1*